Louisiana, session 2026, SB282.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9038.82 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9038.82. Baton Rouge Community College Economic Development District
A. There is hereby created in East Baton Rouge Parish, in which Baton
Rouge Community College is located, hereafter in this Section referred to as a
"college", the Baton Rouge Community College Economic Development District
includes property owned by either of this institution to provide for cooperative
economic and community development among the district, the college, the local
governmental subdivision, the state, and the owners of property in the district.
Page 1 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
Hereafter in this Section, the terms "college economic development district" or
"district" refer to a district created pursuant to this Section. The college
economic development district is a political subdivision of the state having all
of the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities accorded by law and the
Constitution of Louisiana to political subdivisions of the state, subject to the
limitations provided in this Section.
B.(1) Boundaries for the Baton Rouge Community College Economic
Development District. The Baton Rouge Community College Economic
Development District, referred to in this Section as "BRCC EDD", generally
encompasses an area within the city of Baton Rouge, Louisiana.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the property
descriptions provided in Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this Paragraph, whether
specifically identified or not, no portion of the BRCC EDD shall include any
tract of land that is used for residential purposes, except for hotels, motels, inns,
or bed and breakfasts for temporary occupancy, in any form or fashion,
including, without limitation, private or public homes, residences, housing,
dwellings, apartments, studios, flats, townhomes, condominiums, cooperatives,
residential rooms, residential beds, dormitories, student residences and housing,
student apartments, fraternity houses, sorority houses, student residential
quarters or other form or housing, as of January 24, 2026, individually and
collectively "residential properties". All residential properties are deemed
district exclusions. In the event that the description of the BRCC EDD set forth
in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph includes any of the district exclusions,
the district exclusion shall not be considered as a component of the BRCC EDD.
C.(1) The district shall be administered and governed by a board of
commissioners, referred to in this Section as the "board".
(2) The board shall be comprised as follows:
(a) The highest executive officer of the college shall appoint four persons
and shall serve as a member of the board and chairman of the board as long as
Page 2 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
he is the highest executive officer of the college.
(b) Two of the members of the board shall be representatives from
businesses within the district.
(3) Members shall serve five-year terms after initial terms as provided
by the ordinance creating the district. The president shall serve as long as he is
president of the university. Two members shall serve an initial term of two
years, and two members shall serve an initial term of three years, as determined
by lot at the first meeting of the board. Each member of the board shall
continue to serve until reappointed or a successor is duly appointed. Any
vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled in the manner of the
original appointment for the unexpired term. If an appointment to fill a vacancy
is not made within sixty days, the board shall appoint an interim successor to
serve until the position is filled by the appointing authority.
(4) Any member of the board may be removed by a three-fourths vote
of the remaining membership of the board for cause, which may include failure
to attend at least one-half of the meetings of the board in a two-year period.
(5) The members of the board shall serve without salary or per diem.
The board may reimburse any member for reasonable, actual, and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of his duties pursuant to this Section.
(6) The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice president,
a secretary, and a treasurer, whose duties shall be those common to these
offices. At the option of the board, the offices of secretary and treasurer may be
held by one person.
(7) The board shall meet in regular session at least once per year and
shall also meet in special session as often as the president of the board convenes
the board or upon the written request of at least three members. A majority of
the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make them
available for inspection through the board's secretary or secretary-treasurer,
Page 3 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
who shall also maintain the minute books and archives of the district. The
monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the official custody of the
board.
(8) The domicile of the board shall be established by the board at a
location within the district. The official journal of the district is the official
journal of the parish where the domicile of the board is located.
D. The district, acting by and through its board, shall have and exercise
all powers of a political subdivision necessary or convenient for the carrying out
of its objects and purposes, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To sue and to be sued.
(2) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(3) To acquire by gift, grant, or purchase all property, including rights-
of-way, movable, immovable, or mixed, corporeal or incorporeal, or any interest
therein.
(4) To enter into contracts for the purchase, acquisition, construction,
and improvement of works and facilities necessary in connection with the
purposes of the district.
(5) In its own name and on its own behalf to incur debt and to issue
revenue bonds, special assessment bonds, certificates, notes, and other evidences
of indebtedness and to levy and cause to be collected certain taxes as provided
in this Section and as may be provided by general law.
(6) To regulate the imposition of fees and rentals charged by the district
for its facilities and services rendered by it.
(7) To borrow money and pledge all or part of its revenues, leases, rents,
or other advantages as security for the loans.
(8) To appoint officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties;
and fix their compensation.
(9) To develop public improvement projects for the benefit of the
respective college, either directly with the respective college or through one or
Page 4 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
more private foundations or nonprofit corporations affiliated with the
respective college, or both.
(10) To exercise any and all of the powers granted to an economic
development district as if the district were an economic development district
established pursuant to Part II of this Chapter, including but not limited to the
powers of tax increment financing pursuant to R.S. 33:9038.33 and 9038.34 and
the power to levy taxes within the district pursuant to R.S. 33:9038.39. The
district shall exercise the powers in accordance with the provisions of Part II of
this Chapter.
(11) To exercise any and all of the powers granted to a community
development district as if the district were a community development district
established pursuant to Chapter 27-B of this Title, including but not limited to
the power to levy special assessments on property within the district pursuant
to R.S. 33:9039.29. The district shall exercise the powers in accordance with the
provisions of Chapter 27-B of this Title.
E.(1) It is expressly provided that any sales and use tax levied by the
district or any subdistrict created by the district may exceed the limitation set
forth by Article VI, Section 29(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana and shall be
imposed, collected, and enforced subject to the terms of the resolution imposing
the tax and the provisions of Chapter 2 of Subtitle II of Title 47 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2)(a) The district and any subdistrict created by the district may levy
taxes or assessments of any type only after the board has adopted an
appropriate resolution giving notice of its intention to levy the taxes or
assessments. The resolution shall include a general description of the taxes or
assessments to be levied. The district or subdistrict shall give notice of its
intention by publication once per week for two weeks in the official journal of
the district, the first publication to appear at least fourteen days before the
public meeting of the board at which the board shall hear any objections to the
Page 5 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
proposed taxes or assessments. The notice of intent so published shall state the
date, time, and place of the public hearing.
(b) The taxes or assessments may be levied only after the board has
called a special election submitting the proposition for the levy of the taxes or
assessments to the qualified electors of the district or subdistrict, as applicable,
and the proposition has received the favorable vote of a majority of the electors
voting in the election. Any election held pursuant to this Section shall be
conducted in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code and held on a date
that corresponds with an election date provided by R.S. 18:402(A)(1) or (B)(1).
However, if there are no qualified electors in the district or subdistrict, as
applicable, as certified by the registrar of voters, no election is required, but the
taxes or assessments shall not be levied unless approved by the governing
authority of the local governmental subdivision.
(c) The powers and rights conferred by this Paragraph shall be in
addition to the powers and rights conferred by any other general or special law.
This Paragraph does and shall be construed to provide a complete and
additional method for the levy of any taxes or assessments. No election,
proceeding, notice, or approval shall be required for the levy of the taxes or
assessments except as provided in this Paragraph.
F.(1) The district may create subdistricts as provided in this Subsection.
The district shall publish notice of its intent to create a subdistrict in the official
journal of the district. At least ten days after publication of the notice, the board
shall conduct a public hearing on the question of creating the subdistrict.
Thereafter, the board may designate one or more areas within the boundaries
of the district as subdistricts of the district. Each subdistrict shall constitute a
political subdivision of the state and shall be governed by the board. Each
subdistrict shall have the same powers as the district and shall be given a
suitable name as the board may designate. Hereafter in this Section, any
reference to the district includes any subdistrict created by the district.
Page 6 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
(2) The boundaries of a district may be changed in accordance with
provisions of this Section dealing with the establishment of the original
boundaries. If a district is expanded to include an area where qualified electors
reside, no tax shall be collected in the added area unless the qualified electors
of that added area approve the tax in accordance with Subparagraph (E)(2)(b)
of this Section.
G.(1) The district may issue and sell from time to time bonds, notes,
renewal notes, refunding bonds, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness,
certificates of participation, debentures, warrants, commercial paper, or other
obligations or evidences of indebtedness to provide funds for and to fulfill and
achieve its public purpose or corporate purposes, as set forth in this Section,
including but not limited to the payment of all or a portion of the costs of a
project, to provide amounts necessary for any corporate purposes, including
necessary and incidental expenses in connection with the issuance of the
obligations, the payment of principal and interest on the obligations of the
district, the establishment of reserves to secure the obligations, and all other
purposes and expenditures of the district incident to and necessary or
convenient to carry out its public functions or corporate purposes, and any
credit enhancement for the obligations.
(2) Except as may otherwise be provided by the board, all obligations
issued by the district shall be negotiable instruments and payable solely from
the revenues of the district as determined by the board, or from any other
source that may be available to the district but shall not be secured by the full
faith and credit of the state or the local governmental subdivision.
(3) Obligations shall be authorized, issued, and sold by a resolution or
resolutions of the board. The bonds or obligations may be of the series; bear the
date or dates; mature at the time or times; bear interest at the rate or rates,
including variable, adjustable, or zero interest rates; be payable at the time or
times; be in the denominations; be sold at the price or prices, at public or
Page 7 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
private negotiated sale, after advertisement as is provided for in R.S. 39:1426;
be in the form; carry the registration and exchangeability privileges; be payable
at the place or places; be subject to the terms of redemption; and be entitled to
the priorities on the income, revenue, and receipts of, or available to, the district
as may be provided by the board in the resolution or resolutions providing for
the issuance and sale of the bonds or obligations of the district.
(4) The obligations of the district shall be signed by the officers of the
board by either manual or facsimile signatures as shall be determined by
resolution or resolutions of the board and may have impressed or imprinted
thereon the seal of the district or a facsimile thereof.
(5) Any obligations of the district may be validly issued, sold, and
delivered, notwithstanding that one or more of the officers of the board signing
the obligations, or whose facsimile signature or signatures may be on the
obligations, shall have ceased to be the officer of the board at the time the
obligations shall actually have been delivered.
(6) Obligations of the district may be sold in the manner and from time
to time as may be determined by the board to be most beneficial, subject to
approval of the State Bond Commission, and the district may pay all expenses,
premiums, fees, or commissions which it may deem necessary or advantageous
in connection with the issuance and sale thereof.
(7) The board may authorize the establishment of a fund or funds for the
creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, or other
funds or reserves as the board may approve with respect to the financing and
operation of any project funded with the proceeds of the bonds and as may be
authorized by any bond resolution, trust agreement, indenture of trust, or
similar instrument or agreement pursuant to the provisions of which the
issuance of bonds or other obligations of the district or subdistrict may be
authorized.
(8) Any cost, obligation, or expense incurred for any of the purposes or
Page 8 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
powers of the district specified in this Subsection shall be a part of the project
costs and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of bonds or
other obligations issued by the district; however, no portion of any state sales
taxes made directly available to the district pursuant to an agreement with the
state shall be used by the district to pay the costs of constructing or operating
any privately owned hotel located within the district without the consent of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget or its successor.
(9) For a period of thirty days from the date of publication of the
resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds hereunder, any persons in interest
shall have the right to contest the legality of the resolution and the legality of the
bond issue for any cause, after which time no one shall have any cause or right
of action to contest the legality of the resolution or of the bonds authorized
thereby for any cause whatsoever. If no suit, action, or proceeding is begun
contesting the validity of the bond issue within thirty days, the authority to issue
the bonds and to provide for the payment thereof and the legality thereof and
all of the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, shall
be conclusively presumed, and no court shall have authority to inquire into the
matters.
(10) Neither the members of the board nor any person executing the
bonds shall be personally liable for the bonds or be subject to any personal
liability by reason of the issuance thereof. No earnings or assets of the district
shall accrue to the benefit of any private persons. However, the limitation of
liability provided for in this Paragraph shall not apply to any gross negligence
or criminal negligence on the part of any member of the board or person
executing the bonds.
(11) All obligations authorized to be issued by the district pursuant to the
provisions of this Subsection, together with interest thereof, income therefrom,
and gain upon the sale thereof shall be exempt from all state and local taxes.
(12) The state and all public officers; any parish, municipality, or other
Page 9 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
subdivision or instrumentality of the state; any political subdivision; any bank,
banker, trust company, savings bank and institution, building and loan
association, savings and loan association, investment company, or any person
carrying on a banking or investment business, any insurance company or
business, insurance association, and any person carrying on an insurance
business; and any executor, administrator, curator, trustee, and other fiduciary;
and any retirement system or pension fund may legally invest any sinking funds
monies; or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds
or other obligations issued by the district pursuant to the provisions of this
Subsection, and the bonds or other obligations shall be authorized security for
all public deposits. It is the purpose of this Section to authorize the persons,
firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions and officers, or other
entities, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them,
including but not limited to sinking, insurance, investment, retirement,
compensation, pension, and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the
purchase of any bonds or other obligations of the district or subdistrict, and
that the bonds shall be authorized security for all public deposits. However,
nothing contained in this Section with regard to legal investments or security for
public deposits shall be construed as relieving any person, firm, corporation, or
other entity from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.
H.(1) Each district and any subdistrict created by the college district may
be the recipient of a sales or use tax increment which consist of that portion of
the designated incremental sales or use tax collected each year on the sale at
retail, the use, the lease or rental, the consumption and storage for use or
consumption of tangible personal property, and on sales of services, all as
defined in R.S. 47:301 et seq. or any other appropriate provision or provisions
of law as amended.
(2) The sales or use tax increment may include hotel occupancy taxes,
occupancy taxes, or similar taxes, or any combination of these taxes, levied upon
Page 10 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-233 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 282
the use or occupancy of hotel rooms if so designated by the city of Baton Rouge,
parish of East Baton Rouge as the tax recipient entity, from taxpayers located
within a college economic development district and subdistrict which exceeds
the designated sales or use tax revenues and hotel occupancy taxes, occupancy
taxes, or similar taxes so designated that were collected in the year immediately
prior to the year in which the college economic development district and any
subdistrict was established.
I. The district shall dissolve and cease to exist upon the later to occur of
either one year after the date on which all loans, bonds, notes, and other
evidences of indebtedness of the district, including refunding bonds, are paid in
full as to both principal and interest or fifty years from the creation of the
district.
J. This Section, being necessary for the welfare of the state, the parish,
and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.